Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-516
Unauthorized use of a propelled vehicle; affirmative defense; penalties.

(1) A person commits the offense of unauthorized use of a propelled vehicle if he or she intentionally exerts unauthorized control over another's propelled vehicle by operating it without the owner's consent.

(2) Propelled vehicle shall mean an automobile, airplane, motorcycle, motorboat, or other motor-propelled vehicle.

(3) It is an affirmative defense to prosecution under this section that the defendant reasonably believed that the owner would have authorized the use had he or she known of it.

(4) Unauthorized use of a propelled vehicle is a Class III misdemeanor for the first offense, a Class I misdemeanor for the second offense, and a Class IV felony for the third and any subsequent offenses.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 115;

Laws 1993, LB 430, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 371, § 7.